Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-437
Sections construed; limitation on powers.

None of the provisions of sections 31-401 to 31-450 shall be construed as repealing or in anywise modifying the provisions of any other act relating to the subject of drainage. Nothing therein contained shall be deemed to authorize any drainage district to divert the waters of any river, creek, stream, canal or ditch from its channel to the detriment of any person or persons having any interest in such river, creek, stream, canal or ditch or the waters therein, unless proper compensation be ascertained and paid therefor under the laws of this state relating to the taking of private property for public use. No change of the channel or location of any river or stream dividing counties shall operate to relieve either county from contribution to the building and repairing of any bridge over such river or stream, but said liability shall continue, notwithstanding work done under said sections may remove any river or stream from the boundary line between counties.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 31, p. 485;

R.S.1913, § 1901;

C.S.1922, § 1849;

C.S.1929, § 31-537;

R.S.1943, § 31-437.

Right of landowner to recover compensation for taking of private property for public use is recognized. Armbruster v. Stanton-Pilger Drainage Dist., 169 Neb. 594, 100 N.W.2d 781 (1960).